Idaho, session 2025, H0164.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 68, Title 33, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 68
IDAHO EDUCATION OPPORTUNITY PROGRAM
33-6801. IDAHO EDUCATION OPPORTUNITY PROGRAM -- IDAHO EDUCATION OP-
PORTUNITY FUND. (1) There is hereby established the Idaho education opportu-
nity program (IEOP), to be administered by the state department of education
according to the provisions of this chapter.
(2) To administer this program, the state department of education
shall:
(a) Establish an IEOP application process; and
(b) Subject to appropriation, award IEOP grants under this program
to qualifying students based on the household adjusted gross income
of a qualifying student and as a percentage of the average distribu-
tion to the school district for one (1) student as provided in section
33-6803(4), Idaho Code.
(3)(a) There is hereby established in the state treasury the Idaho
education opportunity program fund, to be administered by the state
department of education. Moneys in the fund shall be continuously ap-
propriated for the purpose of funding student accounts pursuant to this
chapter. Funds shall consist of:
(i) Legislative appropriations;
(ii) Donations and contributions made to the fund; and
(iii) Interest earned on idle moneys in the fund.
(b) The public education stabilization fund may not be utilized to fund
the Idaho education opportunity program.
33-6802. DEFINITIONS. For the purposes of this chapter:


(1) "Average distribution" means a calculation of eligible funds
for the IEOP divided by the student enrollment counts pursuant to section
33-1027, Idaho Code. "Eligible funds for the IEOP" shall mean all moneys
appropriated by the legislature from state funds for the educational support
program and other program distributions, including health insurance and
discretionary funding, less the appropriation amounts identified for the
listed programs: border contracts pursuant to section 33-1002(2)(d), Idaho
Code, Idaho safe and drug free schools pursuant to section 63-2506, Idaho
Code, advanced opportunities pursuant to section 33-1002(2)(m), Idaho Code,
and school facilities fund pursuant to section 33-911, Idaho Code.
(2) "Eligible postsecondary institution" means a community college,
a university under the jurisdiction of the state board of education or the
board of regents of the university of Idaho, or an accredited private post-
secondary institution.
(3) "Obscene material" means any depiction that is harmful to minors
pursuant to section 18-1514 6., Idaho Code.
(4) "Parent" means the parent or legal guardian of a qualified student.
(5) "Personalized student education plan" means a plan prepared by or
on behalf of a qualified student to describe how funds from the IEOP would be
utilized to provide the qualifying student with a thorough education in at
least the subjects of reading, writing, grammar, mathematics, social stud-
ies, and science.
(6) "Public school" means any public school within any public school
district organized under the laws of this state, including specially char-
tered school districts, and any public charter school organized under the
laws of this state.
(7) "Qualified expenses" means expenses on behalf of a qualified stu-
dent for:
(a) Tuition or fees at a qualified school, vocational and life skills
program, or career technical education program approved by the state
department of education;
(b) Textbooks required by a qualified school curricula and supplemen-
tary materials;
(c) Reasonable and efficient transportation to and from a qualified
school or local field trips no more than thirty (30) miles from the qual-
ified school;
(d) Any necessary equipment for classes, such as assistive technology
for qualified students with disabilities or required electronic equip-
ment;
(e) Educational therapies from a licensed or accredited practitioner
or provider, including and up to any amount not covered by insurance or
medicaid if the expense is partially paid by a health insurance policy
or medicaid for the qualified student;
(f) Fees for nationally normed assessment tests, advanced placement
examinations, or any exam related to college or university admission;
(g) Fees to manage the IEOP account. These fees may not exceed three and
one half percent (3.5%) of total funds distributed in a single academic
year;
(h) Services provided by a public school, including individual classes
and extracurricular programs. A school may not count a student under


this paragraph for enrollment purposes but may charge the student a rea-
sonable fee for the service;
(i) Uniforms purchased from or through a qualified school or uniform
provider approved by the qualified school;
(j) Tutoring by a qualified tutor who is not a family member within the
second degree of consanguinity;
(k) Internet access if the student or the parent of the student does not
have internet access. If internet access is purchased with these funds,
the services provided may not be used to access or view obscene mate-
rial; and
(l) Other technological devices, including but not limited to calcula-
tors, microscopes, telescopes, and printers. This does not include en-
tertainment and other primarily noneducational devices such as televi-
sions, telephones, video game consoles and accessories, or home theater
and audio equipment.
(8) "Qualified school" means any accredited nongovernmental primary or
secondary school that is located in this state or any eligible postsecondary
institution.
(9) "Qualified student" means a student who is a resident of Idaho,
is of age as defined in section 33-201, Idaho Code, resides within a school
district in this state, and is eligible to enroll in a public kindergarten
program or any grades 1 through 12. Students eligible to enroll in any grade
1 through 12 must have been enrolled in a public school and attended for at
least ninety (90) school days to be a qualified student unless the student
participated in the Idaho education opportunity program in kindergarten,
the student was not enrolled in any school prior to enrolling in grade 1, or
the student has relocated to the state of Idaho from another state and was
enrolled in a public school in that state prior to relocating to Idaho. The
student may not be simultaneously enrolled in a public school or a kinder-
garten program while receiving a grant pursuant to this chapter. This
definition shall not include a student who is homeschooled.
(10) "Special needs student" means a student that is eligible to enroll
in an Idaho school district in any grade from kindergarten through grade 12
who is receiving services under an individualized education program pur-
suant to 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq.
33-6803. IDAHO EDUCATION OPPORTUNITY PROGRAM ACCOUNTS. (1) IEOP ac-
counts are established to provide options for students' education in this
state. To enroll a student for an IEOP account and to continue to receive
funds each school year, the parent of the qualified student must apply by
June 15 of the year funds are sought to be provided and sign an agreement to:
(a) Use the IEOP account money to provide an education to the qualify-
ing student in at least the subjects of reading, writing, grammar, math-
ematics, social studies, and science. Moneys may be used to provide a
thorough education in more subjects as long as the qualified student is
receiving an education in the subjects listed in this paragraph;
(b) Not enroll the qualified student in an Idaho public school and to
relieve the school district from all obligations to educate the quali-
fied student;


(c) Use moneys deposited in the qualified student's IEOP account only
for qualified expenses pursuant to section 33-6802(7), Idaho Code; and
(d) Not to use funds for new electronic equipment such as a laptop for
the qualified student more than one (1) time every five (5) years.
(2) The state department of education shall respond to a properly com-
pleted application submitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
within thirty (30) days of the application's submission.
(3) The state department of education shall determine the average dis-
tribution pursuant to section 33-6804(1), Idaho Code, and shall post the av-
erage distribution on its official website by June 1 each year.
(4)(a) After a parent agrees to the terms stipulated in this section,
the state department of education shall transfer funds into the qual-
ified student's individual IEOP account in accordance with section
33-6804, Idaho Code, as follows:
(i) For students who are not special needs students, an amount of
funds equal to:
1. Eighty percent (80%) of the money distributed for the av-
erage distribution to a school district for one (1) student,
if the student's parents' adjusted gross income is less than
seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000).
2. Sixty percent (60%) of the money distributed for the av-
erage distribution to a school district for one (1) student,
if the student's parents' adjusted gross income is greater
than or equal to seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) and
less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
3. Forty percent (40%) of the money distributed for the av-
erage distribution to a school district for one (1) student,
if the student's parents' adjusted gross income is greater
than or equal to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)
and less than one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($125,000).
4. Twenty percent (20%) of the money distributed for the av-
erage distribution to a school district for one (1) student,
if the student's parents' adjusted gross income is greater
than or equal to one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($125,000).
(ii) For students who are special needs students, an amount of
funds equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the money distributed
for the average distribution to a school district for one (1) stu-
dent.
(iii) For all qualified students, an amount, subject to appropri-
ation, to cover any required fees to manage the IEOP account pur-
suant to section 33-6802(7)(g), Idaho Code.
(b) The public school district in which the student resides at the time
of application or renewal, for each qualifying student approved for an
IEOP grant under paragraph (a)(i) of this subsection, and not special
needs students as identified in paragraph (a)(ii) of this subsection,
shall receive a distribution of twenty percent (20%) of the average dis-
tribution.


(c) A student shall not be eligible to receive additional funding after
the student graduates from an Idaho qualified school or the student is
no longer a qualified student as defined in 33-6802, Idaho Code.
(d) Unused IEOP funds remaining in a student's IEOP account following
completion of each academic year following kindergarten through grade
11 may be rolled over for the next qualified academic year if the qual-
ified student provides evidence that the student has achieved grade
level or demonstrated one (1) full year of academic growth. Following
high school graduation, the funds remaining in the individual qualified
student's IEOP account may continue to be used for qualified expenses at
an eligible postsecondary institution as long as the account is prop-
erly renewed pursuant to section 33-6804, Idaho Code.
(e) The fund distributions pursuant to this subsection shall be cal-
culated from all state appropriations for public schools and public
charter schools, including moneys available in the public school income
fund minus the funds appropriated for educational services for the deaf
and blind pursuant to section 33-3408, Idaho Code, and statewide ser-
vices as appropriated in the central services division.
(5) The school district in which the qualified student resides shall
allow a qualified student, at no cost, to participate in the SAT, ISAT, or
IRI programs to determine personal academic growth and achievement. The re-
sults shall not be aggregated within the school district academic progress
reports.
(6) All decisions relating to philosophy or doctrine, selection of
books, teaching materials and curriculum, and methods, timing, and place in
the provision or evaluation of home-based instruction shall be the respon-
sibility of the parent except for matters specifically referred to in this
chapter.
33-6804. FUNDING PROCEDURES -- RENEWAL.
(1)(a) Funds shall be deposited into the individual qualified stu-
dent's IEOP account as follows:
(i) Fifty percent (50%) of the total funds to be deposited shall
be deposited on August 15 of the year in which the qualifying stu-
dent is admitted to the IEOP; and
(ii) The remaining fifty percent (50%) shall be distributed in
two (2) separate installments equaling twenty-five percent (25%)
of the total funds available. The first installment shall be
distributed in November, and the second installment shall be dis-
tributed in February. Distributions shall occur no later than the
fifteenth day of the corresponding month.
(b) If appropriated funds allow and a qualifying student has moved to
Idaho after an academic year has started and is enrolled in the IEOP,
then the student may apply to the state department of education and
shall receive half of the total amount of the distributions made during
the current academic year.
(c) If appropriated funds are insufficient to fund all qualified appli-
cants, then IEOP funds shall be distributed in the following order of
priority:


(i) First priority to qualified students who meet the criteria
provided in section 33-6803(4)(a)(ii), Idaho Code;
(ii) Second priority to qualified students who meet the criteria
provided in section 33-6803(4)(a)(i)1., Idaho Code;
(iii) Third priority to qualified students who meet the criteria
provided in section 33-6803(4)(a)(i)2., Idaho Code;
(iv) Fourth priority to qualified students who meet the criteria
provided in section 33-6803(4)(a)(i)3., Idaho Code; and
(v) Fifth priority to qualified students who meet the criteria
provided in section 33-6803(4)(a)(i)4., Idaho Code.
(d) Money deposited into a qualified student's IEOP account and money
expended from a qualified student's IEOP account for qualified expenses
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall not be considered tax-
able income.
(e) Money from an IEOP account may not be refunded, rebated, or shared
with the parents of an eligible student or an eligible student in any
manner, except that funds may be remitted or refunded to an IEOP account
in accordance with procedures established by the state department of
education.
(2) To continue to receive funds, a parent of a qualified student who
has received an IEOP grant award shall file an application with the state de-
partment of education to renew the student's account on an annual basis as
follows:
(a) The application for renewal shall be submitted to the state depart-
ment of education by June 15 prior to the academic year funds are sought
to be deposited. The application for renewal shall include a certifi-
cation that the parent consents to the requirements listed in section
33-6803, Idaho Code.
(b) For a qualified student with a personalized student education
plan that does not include full-time attendance at a qualified school,
the application for renewal shall include evidence demonstrating that
the student is at grade level or has improved by one (1) grade level
through a nationally normed assessment test, which may include the ISAT
or IRI assessment programs provided to a student pursuant to section
33-6803(5), Idaho Code. Such evidence shall include an affidavit exe-
cuted by a parent of the student stating that the student has completed
a nationally normed assessment test, the results of such indicate that
the student is at grade level or has improved by one (1) grade level, and
a copy of the test results are attached to the affidavit.
(c) For a qualified student who is attending a qualified school, the
application for renewal shall include an affidavit executed by a rep-
resentative of the qualified school stating that the student has com-
pleted a nationally normed assessment test, and the parents of the stu-
dent have been provided a copy of the test results, and a copy of the test
results are attached to the affidavit.
(d) If a parent does not renew the qualified student's IEOP account for
a period of two (2) academic years, the state department of education
shall notify the parent by mail that, unless a renewal is filed, the ac-
count will be closed in sixty (60) days; provided that a parent, or a
student who has graduated from high school and is eighteen (18) years of


age or older, may apply to the state department of education to extend
this time limit by up to four (4) years if the qualified student will be
unable to use the remaining funds during the two (2) year window due to
community service commitments, military service commitments, or reli-
gious service commitments. Moneys remaining in a closed account shall
return to the general fund.
33-6805. ADMINISTRATION. (1) The state department of education may
contract with private financial management firms to manage the IEOP ac-
counts.
(2) The state department of education shall conduct random audits of
IEOP accounts on a quarterly basis and may conduct additional audits as nec-
essary to ensure compliance with the terms of this chapter. The state de-
partment of education may contract with a third party to conduct such audits.
(3) The state department of education shall coordinate with and pro-
vide relevant information to the state tax commission concerning IEOP ac-
counts and student and parent financial information to assist with audit-
ing the private school tuition deduction provided in section 63-3022W, Idaho
Code. The state tax commission shall provide information concerning house-
hold adjusted gross income to the state department of education to assist in
determining the amount of funds a qualified student is eligible to receive
pursuant to section 33-6803(4), Idaho Code.
(4) The state department of education may remove any parent or quali-
fied student from eligibility from the IEOP if the parent or qualified stu-
dent fails to comply with the terms of this chapter or if the parent or quali-
fied student does not respond and take corrective action within fifteen (15)
days. A decision to remove eligibility or withhold funds may be appealed by a
process established by the state department of education.
(5) This chapter does not permit any government agency to exercise con-
trol or supervision over any nonpublic school or homeschooling. A qualified
school that accepts a payment from a parent pursuant to this chapter is not
an agent of the state or federal government. A qualified school shall not be
required to alter its creed, practices, admissions policy, or curriculum in
order to accept qualified students whose tuition or fees are paid through an
IEOP account pursuant to this chapter in order to participate as a qualified
school.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 30, Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 63-3022W, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
63-3022W. PRIVATE SCHOOL TUITION AND FEES -- RULEMAKING. (1) For tax-
able years commencing January 1, 2026, there shall be allowed for individual
taxpayers a deduction to Idaho taxable income an amount equal to the cost
of tuition and fees paid by the taxpayer for a qualified dependent child
of the taxpayer who is attending a qualified school as defined in section
33-6802(8), Idaho Code, offering instruction in grades kindergarten through
grade 12 during the taxable year. A school shall be deemed accredited pur-
suant to this section if it has been accredited according to the accrediting
standards promulgated by the Idaho department of education, the Idaho state


board of education, or a secular or religious accrediting association recog-
nized by the Idaho department of education.
(2) As used in this section, a "qualified dependent child" also in-
cludes the plural term and means one (1) or more individuals who:
(a) Qualifies as a dependent of the taxpayer under section 152, Inter-
nal Revenue Code;
(b) Is actually claimed as a dependent on the taxpayer's Idaho income
tax return;
(c) Is a child of the taxpayer, a stepchild of the taxpayer, an individ-
ual for whom the taxpayer has been appointed guardian, or a descendant
of a child of a taxpayer; and
(d) Resides in Idaho for at least one hundred eighty (180) days dur-
ing the taxable year. If the qualified dependent child resides in Idaho
less than one hundred eighty (180) days, the taxpayer shall be allowed a
partial deduction, on a pro rata basis.
(3) The deduction to taxable income allowed by this section shall be
in the amount of the actual tuition paid by the taxpayer to an Idaho kinder-
garten through grade 12 private school, subject to subsection (2)(d) of this
section, and shall not include any money received or paid on behalf of a stu-
dent pursuant to the Idaho education opportunity program provided chapter
68, title 33, Idaho Code.
(4) The deduction to taxable income allowed by this section shall be
claimed in a manner prescribed by the state tax commission. The deduction
provided in this section shall be claimed on only one (1) tax return for any
individual qualified dependent child. In the case of divorced parents or
parents who do not live together, if the qualified dependent child is in the
custody of one (1) or both of the child's parents for more than one-half of a
calendar year, such child is the qualified dependent child of the custodial
parent for the taxable year beginning during such calendar year. However,
the child may be the qualified dependent child of the noncustodial parent if
either of the following requirements are met:
(a) A court of competent jurisdiction has unconditionally awarded, in
writing, to the noncustodial parent the tax benefits associated with
the child pursuant to section 32-706, Idaho Code, and the noncustodial
parent attaches a copy of the court order to the noncustodial parent's
income tax return for the taxable year; or
(b) The custodial parent signs a written declaration that such custo-
dial parent will not claim the deduction of this section with respect to
such child for any taxable year beginning in such calendar year, and the
noncustodial parent attaches such written declaration to the noncusto-
dial parent's income tax return for the taxable year beginning during
such calendar year.
(5) The state tax commission shall establish rules, subject to legisla-
tive approval, to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.


SECTION 4. This act shall be in full force and effect on and after Jan-
uary 1, 2026.